tests/cv-possessives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "The noun ывӑл (ends with consonant)":
    ывӑл<n><nom> : ывӑл
    ывӑл<n><gen> : ывӑлӑн
    ывӑл<n><dat> : ывӑла
    ывӑл<n><loc> : ывӑлра   # check!
    ывӑл<n><abl> : ывӑлран  # check!
    ывӑл<n><ins> : ывӑлпа
    ывӑл<n><abe> : ывӑлсӑр
    ывӑл<n><term> : ывӑлшӑн
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><nom> : ывӑлӑм
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><gen> : ывӑлӑмӑн
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><dat> : ывӑлӑма
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><loc> : ывӑлӑмра
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><abl> : ывӑлӑмран
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><ins> : ывӑлӑмпа
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><abe> : ывӑлӑмсӑр
    ывӑл<n><px1sg><term> : ывӑлӑмшӑн
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><nom> : ывӑлу
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><gen> : ывӑлун
    #ывӑл<n><px2sg><gen> : ывӑлунӑн  # check that is okay alternative
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><dat> : ывӑлна
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><loc> : ывӑлунта
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><abl> : ывӑлунтан
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><ins> : ывӑлупа
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><abe> : ывӑлусӑр
    ывӑл<n><px2sg><term> : ывӑлушӑн


  "The noun ача (ends with vowel)":
    ача<n><nom> : ача
    ача<n><gen> : ачан
    ача<n><dat> : ачана
    ача<n><loc> : ачара
    ача<n><abl> : ачаран
    ача<n><ins> : ачапа
    ача<n><abe> : ачасӑр
    ача<n><term> : ачашӑн
    ача<n><px1sg><nom> : ачам
    ача<n><px1sg><gen> : ачамӑн
    ача<n><px1sg><dat> : ачама
    ача<n><px1sg><loc> : ачамра
    ача<n><px1sg><abl> : ачамран
    ача<n><px1sg><ins> : ачампа
    ача<n><px1sg><abe> : ачамсӑр
    ача<n><px1sg><term> : ачамшӑн
    ача<n><px2sg><nom> : ачу
    ача<n><px2sg><gen> : ачунӑн  # check!
    ача<n><px2sg><dat> : ачуна
    ача<n><px2sg><loc> : ачунта
    ача<n><px2sg><abl> : ачунтан
    ача<n><px2sg><ins> : ачупа
    ача<n><px2sg><abe> : ачусӑр
    ача<n><px2sg><term> : ачушӑн

  "The noun ҫын (has geminate consonant)":
    ҫын<n><nom> : ҫын
    ҫын<n><gen> : ҫыннӑн
    ҫын<n><dat> : ҫынна
    ҫын<n><loc> : ҫынра
    ҫын<n><abl> : ҫынран
    ҫын<n><ins> : ҫынпа
    ҫын<n><abe> : ҫынсӑр
    ҫын<n><term> : ҫыншӑн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><nom> : ҫыннӑм
    ҫын<n><px1sg><gen> : ҫыннӑмӑн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><dat> : ҫыннӑма
    ҫын<n><px1sg><loc> : ҫыннӑмра
    ҫын<n><px1sg><abl> : ҫыннӑмран
    ҫын<n><px1sg><ins> : ҫыннӑмпа
    ҫын<n><px1sg><abe> : ҫыннӑмсӑр
    ҫын<n><px1sg><term> : ҫыннӑмшӑн
    ҫын<n><px2sg><nom> : ҫынну
    ҫын<n><px2sg><gen> : ҫыннун
    ҫын<n><px2sg><dat> : ҫынуна
    ҫын<n><px2sg><loc> : ҫынунта
    ҫын<n><px2sg><abl> : ҫынунтан
    ҫын<n><px2sg><ins> : ҫыннупа
    ҫын<n><px2sg><abe> : ҫыннусӑр
    ҫын<n><px2sg><term> : ҫыннушӑн
    ҫын<n><px3sp><nom> : ҫынни
    ҫын<n><px3sp><gen> : ҫыннин
    ҫын<n><px3sp><dat> : ҫыннине
    ҫын<n><px3sp><loc> : ҫыннинче
    ҫын<n><px3sp><abl> : ҫыннинчен
    ҫын<n><px3sp><ins> : ҫыннипе
    ҫын<n><px3sp><abe> : ҫыннисӗр
    ҫын<n><px3sp><term> : ҫыннишӗн
    ҫын<n><px1pl><nom> : ҫыннӑмӑр
    ҫын<n><px1pl><gen> : ҫыннӑмӑрӑн
    ҫын<n><px1pl><dat> : ҫыннӑмӑра
    ҫын<n><px1pl><loc> : ҫыннӑмӑрта
    ҫын<n><px1pl><abl> : ҫыннӑмӑртан
    ҫын<n><px1pl><ins> : ҫыннӑмӑрпа
    ҫын<n><px1pl><abe> : ҫыннӑмӑрсӑр
    ҫын<n><px1pl><term> : ҫыннӑмӑршӑн
    ҫын<n><px2pl><nom> : ҫыннӑр
    ҫын<n><px2pl><gen> : ҫыннӑрӑн
    ҫын<n><px2pl><dat> : ҫыннӑра
    ҫын<n><px2pl><loc> : ҫыннӑрта
    ҫын<n><px2pl><abl> : ҫыннӑртан
    ҫын<n><px2pl><ins> : ҫыннӑрпа
    ҫын<n><px2pl><abe> : ҫыннӑрсӑр
    ҫын<n><px2pl><term> : ҫыннӑршӑн
    ҫын<n><pl><nom> : ҫынсем
    ҫын<n><pl><gen> : ҫынсен
    ҫын<n><pl><dat> : ҫынсене
    ҫын<n><pl><loc> : ҫынсенче
    ҫын<n><pl><abl> : ҫынсенчен
    ҫын<n><pl><ins> : ҫынсемпе
    ҫын<n><pl><abe> : ҫынсемсӗр
    ҫын<n><pl><term> : ҫынсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><nom> : ҫыннӑмсем
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><gen> : ҫыннӑмсен
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><dat> : ҫыннӑмсене
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><loc> : ҫыннӑмсенче
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><abl> : ҫыннӑмсенчен
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><ins> : ҫыннӑмсемпе
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><abe> : ҫынӑмсемсӗр  # check!
    ҫын<n><px1sg><pl><term> : ҫыннӑмсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><nom> : ҫыннусем
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><gen> : ҫыннусен
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><dat> : ҫыннусене
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><loc> : ҫыннусенче
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><abl> : ҫыннусенчен
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><ins> : ҫыннусемпе
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><abe> : ҫыннусемсӗр
    ҫын<n><px2sg><pl><term> : ҫыннусемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><nom> : ҫыннисем
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><gen> : ҫыннисен
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><dat> : ҫыннисене
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><loc> : ҫыннисенче
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><abl> : ҫыннисенчен
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><ins> : ҫыннисемпе
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><abe> : ҫыннисемсӗр
    ҫын<n><px3sp><pl><term> : ҫыннисемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><nom> : ҫыннӑмӑрсем
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><gen> : ҫыннӑмӑрсен
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><dat> : ҫыннӑмӑрсене
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><loc> : ҫыннӑмӑрсенче
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><abl> : ҫыннӑмӑрсенчен
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><ins> : ҫыннӑмӑрсемпе
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><abe> : ҫыннӑмӑрсемсӗр
    ҫын<n><px1pl><pl><term> : ҫыннӑмӑрсемшӗн
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><nom> : ҫыннӑрсем
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><gen> : ҫыннӑрсен
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><dat> : ҫыннӑрсене
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><loc> : ҫыннӑрсенче
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><abl> : ҫыннӑрсенчен
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><ins> : ҫыннӑрсемпе
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><abe> : ҫыннӑрсемсӗр
    ҫын<n><px2pl><pl><term> : ҫыннӑрсемшӗн


  "The noun сӑвӑ (has geminate consonant and ends in short vowel)":
    сӑвӑ<n><nom> : сӑвӑ
    сӑвӑ<n><gen> : сӑввӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><dat> : сӑвва
    сӑвӑ<n><loc> : сӑвӑра
    сӑвӑ<n><abl> : сӑвӑран
    сӑвӑ<n><ins> : сӑвӑпа
    сӑвӑ<n><abe> : сӑвӑсӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><term> : сӑвӑшӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><nom> : сӑввӑм
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><gen> : сӑввӑмӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><dat> : сӑввӑма
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><loc> : сӑввӑмра
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><abl> : сӑввӑмран
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><ins> : сӑввӑмпа
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><abe> : сӑввӑмсӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px1sg><term> : сӑввӑмшӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><nom> : сӑвву
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><gen> : сӑввун
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><dat> : сӑввӑва
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><loc> : сӑввура
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><abl> : сӑввуран
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><ins> : сӑввупа
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><abe> : сӑввусӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px2sg><term> : сӑввушӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><nom> : сӑвви
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><gen> : сӑввийӗн
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><gen> : сӑввин
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><dat> : сӑввнне
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><loc> : сӑввинче
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><abl> : сӑввинчен
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><ins> : сӑввипе
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><abe> : сӑввисӗр
    сӑвӑ<n><px3sp><term> : сӑввишӗн
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><nom> : сӑввӑмӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><gen> : сӑввӑмӑрӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><dat> : сӑввӑмӑра
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><loc> : сӑввӑмӑрта
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><abl> : сӑввӑмӑртан
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><ins> : сӑввӑмӑрпа
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><abe> : сӑввӑмӑрсӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px1pl><term> : сӑввӑмӑршӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><nom> : сӑввӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><gen> : сӑввӑрӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><dat> : сӑввӑра
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><loc> : сӑввӑрта
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><abl> : сӑввӑтан
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><ins> : сӑввӑрпа
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><abe> : сӑввӑрсӑр
    сӑвӑ<n><px2pl><term> : сӑввӑршӑн
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><nom> : сӑвӑсем
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><gen> : сӑвӑсен
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><dat> : сӑвӑсене
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><loc> : сӑвӑсенче
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><abl> : сӑвӑсенчен
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><ins> : сӑвӑсемпе
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><abe> : сӑвӑсемсӗр
    сӑвӑ<n><pl><term> : сӑвӑсемшӗн
    #FIXME: add plural+possessive forms
